North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36A. Trusts and Trustees.
Article 15. North Carolina Uniform Prudent Investor Act. [Repealed]

§§ 36A-161 through 36A-173.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-192, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006.

Editor’s Note.

Prior to repeal of this Chapter, G.S. 36A-174 through 36A-178 had been set out as reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 36A-99-999.

TABLE OF COMPARABLE
SECTIONS FOR
CHAPTER 36A

Former to Present

Editor’s Note.

— The following table shows G.S. sections from Chapter 36A as effective until January 1, 2006 and their comparable section numbers in Chapter 36C, and various other locations as effective January 1, 2006. Where there is no comparable new section number, the term “Repealed” has been inserted.

tablenum=“=table111”> =c1 36A-64
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-65
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-66
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-66.1
. . . . .
Ch. 53, Art. 14 =c1 36A-66.2
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-67
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-68
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-69
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-70
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-71
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-72
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-73
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-74
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-75
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-76
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-77
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-78
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-79
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-80
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-81
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-82
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-83
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-84
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-90-36A-94
. . . . .
Ch. 53, =c2 Art. 14 =c1 36A-100 =c2 36C-4-401A =c1 36A-101
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-107
. . . . .
36C-2-209(a), (b) =c1 36A-108
. . . . .
=c2 36C-2-209(c) =c1 36A-115
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-120
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-125.1
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-125.2
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-125.3
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-125.4
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-125.5
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-125.6
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-125.7
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-125.8
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-125.9
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-125.10
. . . . .
=c2 36C-4-418 =c1 36A-125.11
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-125.12
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-130(a)
. . . . .
=c2 36C-8-814(e) =c1 36A-130(b)
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-135
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-136
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-137
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-138
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-139
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-140
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-141
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-145
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-146
. . . . .
=c2 36C-4-409(d) =c1 36A-147
. . . . .
=c2 36C-4-408 =c1 36A-148
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-161
. . . . .
=c2 36C-9-901 =c1 36A-162
. . . . .
=c2 36C-9-902 =c1 36A-163
. . . . .
=c2 36C-9-903 =c1 36A-164
. . . . .
=c2 36C-9-904 =c1 36A-165
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-166
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-167
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-168
. . . . .
=c2 36C-9-905 =c1 36A-169
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-170
. . . . .
=c2 36C-9-906 =c1 36A-171
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-172
. . . . .
=c2 36C-9-907 =c1 36A-173
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =te =c1 36A-135
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-136
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-137
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-138
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-139
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-140
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-141
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-145
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-146
. . . . .
=c2 36C-4-409(d) =c1 36A-147
. . . . .
=c2 36C-4-408 =c1 36A-148
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-161
. . . . .
=c2 36C-9-901 =c1 36A-162
. . . . .
=c2 36C-9-902 =c1 36A-163
. . . . .
=c2 36C-9-903 =c1 36A-164
. . . . .
=c2 36C-9-904 =c1 36A-165
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-166
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-167
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-168
. . . . .
=c2 36C-9-905 =c1 36A-169
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-170
. . . . .
=c2 36C-9-906 =c1 36A-171
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =c1 36A-172
. . . . .
=c2 36C-9-907 =c1 36A-173
. . . . .
=c2 Repealed =te